Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB504.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Community Energy Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Growth in energy generation provides family-sustaining jobs and investments in this Commonwealth.(2) Programs for community energy generation provide customers with additional energy choices and access to affordable energy options.(3) Community energy programs provide customers, including homeowners, renters and businesses, access to the benefits of Pennsylvania community energy generation that is unconstrained by the physical attributes of their home, farm or business, including roof space, shading or ownership status.(4) In addition to its provision of standard electricity market commodities and services, local energy generation can contribute to a more resilient grid and defer the need for costly new transmission and distribution system investment.(5) The intent of this act is to:20250SB0504PN0772 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Allow electric distribution customers of this Commonwealth to subscribe to a portion of a community energy facility and have the result of the subscription be guaranteed savings.(ii) Reasonably allow for the creation, financing, accessibility and operation of third-party-owned community energy generating facilities and enable robust customer participation.(iii) Encourage the development of community energy programs that will facilitate participation by and for accessibility and operation of third-party-owned community energy generating facilities and enable robust customer participation.(iv) Encourage the development of community energy programs that will facilitate participation by and for the benefit of low-income and moderate-income customers and the communities where they live, reduce barriers to participation by renters and small businesses, promote affordability and improve access to basic public utility services.(v) Maximize the use of Federal money to provide for the development of community energy programs.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bill credit." The commission-approved monetary value of each kilowatt hour of electricity generated by a community energy facility and allocated to a subscriber's monthly bill to offset any part of the subscriber's retail electric bill other 20250SB0504PN0772 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than volumetric or demand-based distribution charges."Brownfield." Real property, the expansion, redevelopment or reuse of which may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of a hazardous substance, pollutant or contaminant."Brownfield community energy facility." A community energy facility that is primarily located on land that is a brownfield."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Community energy facility." A facility that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is located within this Commonwealth.(2) Is connected to and delivers electricity to a distribution system operated by an electric distribution company operating in this Commonwealth and in compliance with requirements under this act.(3) Generates electricity by means of:(i) a solar photovoltaic device with a nameplate capacity rating that does not exceed:(A) 5,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is not a brownfield community energy facility or rooftop community energy facility; and(B) 20,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is a brownfield community energy facility or rooftop community energy facility; or(ii) a renewable natural gas device with a nameplate capacity rating that does not exceed:(A) 5,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is not a brownfield community energy facility; and(B) 20,000 kilowatts of alternating current for a facility that is a brownfield community energy 20250SB0504PN0772 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility.(4) Has no single subscriber who subscribes to more than 50% of the facility capacity in kilowatts or output in kilowatt hours, except if:(i) the single subscriber is a master-metered multifamily residential or commercial building; or(ii) the single subscriber is an agricultural operation as defined in 26 Pa.C.S. § 202 (relating to definitions) and the facility has no fewer than three subscribers.(5) Has not less than 50% of the facility capacity subscribed by subscriptions of 25 kilowatts or less or subscribed by agricultural operations as defined in 26 Pa.C.S. § 202.(6) Credits some or all of the facility-generated electricity to the bills of subscribers.(7) May be located remotely from a subscriber's premises and is not required to provide energy to on-site load.(8) Is owned or operated by a community energy organization.(9) Delivers the amount of energy and capacity that is contracted by each customer."Community energy organization." As follows:(1) An entity that owns or operates a community energy facility and is not required to:(i) be an existing retail electric customer;(ii) purchase electricity directly from the electric distribution company;(iii) serve electric load independent of the community energy facility; or20250SB0504PN0772 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) operate under an account held by the same individual or legal entity of the subscribers to the community energy facility.(2) For the purpose of this definition, a community energy organization shall not be deemed a public utility solely as a result of the organization's ownership or operation of a community energy facility."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Electric distribution company." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."Electric distribution customer." A customer that takes electric distribution service from an electric distribution company, regardless of whether the company is the customer's supplier of electric generation or not."Guaranteed savings." Realized savings by a subscriber from a community energy organization manifested as the difference between the cost of a subscription paid to a community energy facility and the credit received on the subscriber's electric bill for the generation attributed to the subscription."Initial and replacement subscribers." Each subscriber to a single community energy facility over the life of the facility."Low income." A family income at or below 150% of the poverty line as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 9902(2) (relating to definitions) based on the size of the family."Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act." The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Public utility." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).20250SB0504PN0772 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Renewable natural gas device." A device that generates electricity relying upon a fuel source consisting of at least 75% biodiesel or biogas, including biogas derived from municipal solid waste, industrial and food waste, wastewater treatment material and animal manure, resulting from the decomposition of that organic matter under anaerobic conditions, the principal constituents of which are methane and carbon dioxide, that has been upgraded for use in place of fossil natural gas, gasoline or diesel fuel."Rooftop community energy facility." A community energy facility that is primarily located on rooftops."Subscriber." An electric distribution customer of an electric distribution company who contracts for a subscription of a community energy facility interconnected with the customer's electric distribution company. The term includes an electric distribution customer who owns a portion of a community energy facility."Subscriber administrator." An entity that recruits and enrolls a subscriber, administers subscriber participation in a community energy facility and manages the subscription relationship between subscribers and an electric distribution company. The term includes a community energy organization. For the purpose of this definition, a subscriber administrator shall not be considered a public utility solely as a result of the subscriber administrator's operation or ownership of a community energy facility."Subscription." A contract between a subscriber and a subscriber administrator of a community energy facility that entitles the subscriber to a bill credit, measured in kilowatt hours, and applied against the subscriber's retail electric 20250SB0504PN0772 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bill."Unsubscribed energy." The output of a community energy facility, measured in kilowatt hours, that is not allocated to subscribers.Section 4. Authorization to own or operate community energy facilities.A community energy organization or subscriber administrator may develop, build, own or operate a community energy facility. A community energy organization may serve as a subscriber administrator or may contract with a third party to serve as a subscriber administrator on behalf of the community energy organization. Renewable energy credits that are associated with the generation of electricity by a community energy facility shall be the property of the community energy organization and may be retired or transferred by the community energy organization or retired on behalf of the subscribers.Section 5. Bill credit for subscribers to community energy facilities.(a) Credit.--A subscriber to a community energy facility shall receive a monetary bill credit for every kilowatt hour produced by the subscriber's subscription. A community energy facility that demonstrates all of the following to the commission shall have the initial and replacement subscribers of the community energy facility receive a bill credit from the date the community energy facility is authorized by the commission to operate:(1) An executed interconnection agreement with an electric distribution company obtained in accordance with 52 Pa. Code Ch. 75 (relating to alternative energy portfolio standards).20250SB0504PN0772 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Proof of site control.(3) The required nonministerial permits.(4) Proof that the community energy facility will be at least 50% subscribed on the date the community energy facility receives permission to operate.(5) A signed agreement for a commission-approved workforce development requirement.(6) Proof that the community energy facility is constructed or, if not yet constructed, an attestation that the community energy facility will be in compliance with section 13.(7) A community energy organization or subscriber administrator will not bill a subscriber for services provided by an electric distribution company. An electric distribution company may not bill a subscriber for subscription costs to a community energy organization.(b) Establishment of credit.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall establish a bill credit for a public utility that appropriately values the energy, capacity and transmission values produced by a community energy facility and is not less than the bill credit established under 52 Pa. Code § 75.13(e) (relating to general provisions). The terms and conditions of receiving the bill credit may not limit or inhibit participation of subscribers from any rate class.Section 6. Protection for customers.(a) Customer protection provisons.--The commission shall promulgate regulations providing for the protection of a residential customer who has a subscription with a community energy organization or subscriber administrator.20250SB0504PN0772 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Standardized customer disclosure form.--The commission shall develop a standardized customer disclosure form in English and Spanish for a residential customer that identifies key information that is required to be provided by a subscriber administrator to a potential residential subscriber, including future costs and benefits of a subscription and the subscriber's rights and obligations pertaining to a subscription.(c) Subscription costs.--The subscription costs for a subscriber must be lesser than the value of the bill credit and may not include any up-front or sign-on fees or credit checks. The subscription costs shall be nonbasic public utility charges. Failure to pay a subscription may result in the loss of a subscription but shall not impact public utility services.(d) Benefits and costs.--The commission shall maximize benefits and minimize costs to each rate class, notwithstanding participation in a community energy program.(e) Fees prohibited.--A community energy organization may not impose a termination or cancellation fee on a subscriber.(f) Net crediting.--An electric distribution company shall enter into a net crediting agreement with a community energy organization to include a subscriber's subscription fee on a monthly bill and provide a customer with a new credit equivalent to the total bill credit value for the generation period minus the subscription fee. The net crediting agreement shall specify payment terms from the electric distribution company to the community energy organization. The electric distribution company may charge a net crediting fee to the community energy organization that may not exceed 1% of the bill credit value. A nonresidential customer may subscribe to multiple community energy facilities, except that no more than one of the 20250SB0504PN0772 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subscriptions may be under a net credit agreement with an electric distribution company. The electric distribution company shall continue to have the duty for billing all basic electric services, including transmission, distribution and generation charges, consistent in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the commission. The electric distribution company shall also continue to maintain customer services, at a minimum, consistent with existing standards prior to the implementation of a net crediting agreement with a community energy organization in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the commission.Section 7. Duties of electric distribution companies.(a) Report on bill credit.--On a monthly basis, an electric distribution company shall provide to a community energy organization or subscriber administrator a report in a standardized electronic format indicating the total value of the bill credit generated by the community energy facility in the prior month, the calculation used to arrive at the total value of the bill credit and the amount of the bill credit applied to each subscriber.(b) Application of bill credit.--An electric distribution company shall apply a bill credit to a subscriber's next monthly electric bill for the proportional output of a community energy facility attributable to the subscriber. Excess credits on a subscriber's bill shall roll over from month to month. An electric distribution company shall automatically apply excess credits to the final electric bill when a subscription is terminated for any cause.(c) Transferability.--An electric distribution company shall permit the transferability and portability of subscriptions if a 20250SB0504PN0772 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subscriber relocates within the same electric distribution company territory.Section 8. Compensation and cost recovery for electric distribution companies.(a) Compensation.--A community energy organization shall compensate an electric distribution company for the electric distribution company's reasonable administrative costs of interconnection of a community energy facility.(b) Cost recovery.--An electric distribution company may recover reasonable costs from each subscriber organization, subject to approval by the commission, to administer a community energy program within the electric distribution company's service territory of a community energy facility. The Commonwealth shall maximize Federal and State funds for energy assistance, clean energy deployment or any other applicable funding to minimize the cost recovery impact on each subscriber.Section 9. Interconnection standards for community energy facilities.(a) Applications.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, an electric distribution company shall have the following duties:(1) Accept interconnection applications for community energy facilities on a nondiscriminatory basis and study the impact of interconnecting the facilities to the grid using the current commission-approved interconnection rules and tariffs and in accordance with best practices.(2) Include, in an interconnection application for a community energy facility, proof of site control by the community energy facility for the purposes of the study under paragraph (1).20250SB0504PN0772 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Administrative fees.--The commission may impose an administrative fee on an initial interconnection application for community energy facilities under subsection (a). The commission may impose a fee equivalent to up to 5% of the electric distribution company's initial interconnection application fee. The commission may use fees collected under this subsection for the administrative costs directly associated with this act.Section 10. Unsubscribed energy.An electric distribution company shall purchase unsubscribed energy from a community energy facility at the electric distribution company's wholesale energy cost as determined by the commission. To offset real or perceived costs, an electric distribution company shall sell unsubscribed energy to PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., regional transmission organization (PJM) or its successor service territory markets or otherwise decrease energy purchases.Section 11. Customer participation in community energy programs.(a) Participation in programs.--The commission shall promulgate permanent regulations to enable participation in community energy programs by each customer class and economic group in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth within 365 days of the effective date of this subsection.(b) Temporary regulations.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the commission and department may promulgate temporary regulations. The temporary regulations shall be implemented within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection and expire following the date of publication of the permanent regulations under subsection (a) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The temporary regulations shall 20250SB0504PN0772 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Expiration.--The authority of the commission and department to promulgate temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall not expire until the commission promulgates the permanent regulations under subsection (a).(d) Contents.--The temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be based on consideration of formal and informal input from all stakeholders.(2) Establish requirements that ensure access to programs and equitable opportunities for participation for residential and small commercial customer classes.(3) Establish a registration process for community energy organizations.(4) Address the reasonable enforcement of minimum subscription requirements for a community energy facility.(e) Low-income customers.--The commission, in collaboration with the Office of Consumer Advocate, electric distribution companies, community energy organizations and low-income stakeholders, may promulgate regulations adopting mechanisms to 20250SB0504PN0772 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 increase participation by low-income customers in community energy programs. The commission shall increase participation by low-income customers in community energy programs in a manner that allows the commission to use available Federal funds to do all of the following:(1) Deliver larger guaranteed savings to income-qualified households than those households that would receive guaranteed savings without the Federal funds.(2) Maximize State energy assistance programs.Section 12. Location of multiple community energy facilities.The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing limitations on the location of multiple community energy facilities in close proximity. The regulations shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Prohibit an entity or affiliated entity under common control from developing, owning or operating more than one community energy facility on the same parcel or contiguous parcels of land.(2) Authorize a brownfield community energy facility or rooftop community energy facility to be sited on contiguous parcels if the total brownfield community energy facility or rooftop community energy facility capacity on all contiguous parcels does not exceed the limits established by the commission.Section 13. Prevailing wage and labor requirements.(a) Prevailing wage.--A community energy facility for which a bill credit is sought and awarded to a subscriber under this act shall be deemed to meet each of the minimum requirements necessary to apply the wage and benefit rates and related certification of payroll records required under the 20250SB0504PN0772 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. A community energy organization and each of the organization's agents, contractors and subcontractors shall comply with the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act as attested under section 5 for work undertaken at the community energy facility in which a bill credit for a subscriber is sought and awarded.(b) Community energy projects.--A contractor, subcontractor or worker performing construction, reconstruction, demolition, repair or maintenance work on a community energy project funded under this act shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Maintains all valid licenses, registrations or certificates required by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a local government entity that is necessary to do business or perform applicable work.(2) Maintains compliance with the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, and bonding and liability insurance requirements as specified in the contract for the energy project.(3) Has not defaulted on a project, declared bankruptcy, been debarred or suspended on a project by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a local government entity within the previous three years.(4) Has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony relating to the performance or operation of the business of the contractor or subcontractor within the previous 10 years.(5) Has completed a minimum of the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration's 10-hour safety training course or similar training sufficient to 20250SB0504PN0772 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prepare workers for any hazards that may be encountered during their work.(c) Violations.--The Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this section in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth. The Department of Labor and Industry shall apply the same administration and enforcement applicable under the requirements of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act to ensure compliance with subsection (a). In addition to enforcement authorized under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, if the Department of Labor and Industry determines that the community energy organization intentionally failed to pay prevailing wage rates or benefit rates in violation of section 11(h) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for work specified under subsection (a), the community energy organization or the organization's agents, contractors and subcontractors shall pay a fine equivalent to 10% of the value of the bill credit multiplied by the estimated 25-year production of the community energy facility.Section 14. Ratepayer protections.This act shall be construed to minimize direct or indirect costs related to community energy facilities to ratepayers of an electric distribution company that are not subscribers. The commission shall maximize benefits to all rate classes, regardless of participation in a community energy program.Section 15. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0504PN0772 - 17 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526